Washington statutes.
RCW 31.13.010

Definition of corporate credit union or corporate.

As used in this chapter, unless the context in which it is used clearly indicates otherwise, the term "corporate credit union" or "corporate" means a credit union organized under this chapter.

[ 2001 c 83 s 36; 1984 c 31 s 79; 1977 ex.s. c 207 s 5.]